extensions/2827229_corecteur-ortografe-simplifiee/corecteur_ortografe_simplifiee-2.1/dictionaries/fr-erofa.aff
FLAG long
SFX b0 Y 191
SFX b0 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er po:infi
SFX b0 er ant/n'q'd'l'm't's' [^c]er po:ppre
SFX b0 cer çant/n'q'd'l'm't's' cer po:ppre
SFX b0 ecer èce/j'n'q'l'm't's' ecer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 emer ème/j'n'q'l'm't's' emer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 ener ène/j'n'q'l'm't's' ener po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 eper èpe/j'n'q'l'm't's' eper po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 erer ère/j'n'q'l'm't's' erer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 eser èse/j'n'q'l'm't's' eser po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 ever ève/j'n'q'l'm't's' ever po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 evrer èvre/j'n'q'l'm't's' evrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 eter ète/j'n'q'l'm't's' eter po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 eler èle/j'n'q'l'm't's' eler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b0 er è/n'q'l'm't' er po:ipre po:1isg
SFX b0 ecer èces/n'q'l'm't' ecer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 emer èmes/n'q'l'm't' emer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 ener ènes/n'q'l'm't' ener po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 eper èpes/n'q'l'm't' eper po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 erer ères/n'q'l'm't' erer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 eser èses/n'q'l'm't' eser po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 ever èves/n'q'l'm't' ever po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 evrer èvres/n'q'l'm't' evrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 eter ètes/n'q'l'm't' eter po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 eler èles/n'q'l'm't' eler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b0 er ons/n'q'l't' [^c]er po:ipre po:1pl
SFX b0 cer çons/n'q'l't' cer po:ipre po:1pl
SFX b0 er ez/n'q'l'm' er po:ipre po:2pl
SFX b0 ecer ècent/n'q'l'm't's' ecer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 emer èment/n'q'l'm't's' emer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 ener ènent/n'q'l'm't's' ener po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 eper èpent/n'q'l'm't's' eper po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 erer èrent/n'q'l'm't's' erer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 eser èsent/n'q'l'm't's' eser po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 ever èvent/n'q'l'm't's' ever po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 evrer èvrent/n'q'l'm't's' evrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 eter ètent/n'q'l'm't's' eter po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 eler èlent/n'q'l'm't's' eler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b0 er ais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^c]er po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 cer çais/j'n'q'l'm't' cer po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er po:iimp po:3sg
SFX b0 cer çait/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:iimp po:3sg
SFX b0 er ions/n'q'l't' er po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX b0 er iez/n'q'l'm' er po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX b0 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er po:iimp po:3pl
SFX b0 cer çaient/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:iimp po:3pl
SFX b0 er ai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^c]er po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX b0 cer çai/j'n'q'l'm't' cer po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX b0 er as/n'q'l'm't' [^c]er po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX b0 cer ças/n'q'l'm't' cer po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX b0 er a/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX b0 cer ça/n'q'l'm't's' cer po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX b0 er âmes/n'q'l't' [^c]er po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX b0 cer çâmes/n'q'l't' cer po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX b0 er âtes/n'q'l'm' [^c]er po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX b0 cer çâtes/n'q'l'm' cer po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX b0 er èrent/n'q'l'm't's' er po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX b0 ecer ècerai/j'n'q'l'm't' ecer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 emer èmerai/j'n'q'l'm't' emer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 ener ènerai/j'n'q'l'm't' ener po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 eper èperai/j'n'q'l'm't' eper po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 erer èrerai/j'n'q'l'm't' erer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 eser èserai/j'n'q'l'm't' eser po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 ever èverai/j'n'q'l'm't' ever po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 evrer èvrerai/j'n'q'l'm't' evrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 eter èterai/j'n'q'l'm't' eter po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 eler èlerai/j'n'q'l'm't' eler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b0 ecer èceras/n'q'l'm't' ecer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 emer èmeras/n'q'l'm't' emer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 ener èneras/n'q'l'm't' ener po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 eper èperas/n'q'l'm't' eper po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 erer èreras/n'q'l'm't' erer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 eser èseras/n'q'l'm't' eser po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 ever èveras/n'q'l'm't' ever po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 evrer èvreras/n'q'l'm't' evrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 eter èteras/n'q'l'm't' eter po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 eler èleras/n'q'l'm't' eler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b0 ecer ècera/n'q'l'm't's' ecer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 emer èmera/n'q'l'm't's' emer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 ener ènera/n'q'l'm't's' ener po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 eper èpera/n'q'l'm't's' eper po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 erer èrera/n'q'l'm't's' erer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 eser èsera/n'q'l'm't's' eser po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 ever èvera/n'q'l'm't's' ever po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 evrer èvrera/n'q'l'm't's' evrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 eter ètera/n'q'l'm't's' eter po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 eler èlera/n'q'l'm't's' eler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b0 ecer ècerons/n'q'l't' ecer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 emer èmerons/n'q'l't' emer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 ener ènerons/n'q'l't' ener po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 eper èperons/n'q'l't' eper po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 erer èrerons/n'q'l't' erer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 eser èserons/n'q'l't' eser po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 ever èverons/n'q'l't' ever po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 evrer èvrerons/n'q'l't' evrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 eter èterons/n'q'l't' eter po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 eler èlerons/n'q'l't' eler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b0 ecer ècerez/n'q'l'm' ecer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 emer èmerez/n'q'l'm' emer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 ener ènerez/n'q'l'm' ener po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 eper èperez/n'q'l'm' eper po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 erer èrerez/n'q'l'm' erer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 eser èserez/n'q'l'm' eser po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 ever èverez/n'q'l'm' ever po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 evrer èvrerez/n'q'l'm' evrer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 eter èterez/n'q'l'm' eter po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 eler èlerez/n'q'l'm' eler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b0 ecer èceront/n'q'l'm't's' ecer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 emer èmeront/n'q'l'm't's' emer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 ener èneront/n'q'l'm't's' ener po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 eper èperont/n'q'l'm't's' eper po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 erer èreront/n'q'l'm't's' erer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 eser èseront/n'q'l'm't's' eser po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 ever èveront/n'q'l'm't's' ever po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 evrer èvreront/n'q'l'm't's' evrer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 eter èteront/n'q'l'm't's' eter po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 eler èleront/n'q'l'm't's' eler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b0 ecer ècerais/j'n'q'l'm't' ecer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 emer èmerais/j'n'q'l'm't' emer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 ener ènerais/j'n'q'l'm't' ener po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 eper èperais/j'n'q'l'm't' eper po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 erer èrerais/j'n'q'l'm't' erer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 eser èserais/j'n'q'l'm't' eser po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 ever èverais/j'n'q'l'm't' ever po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 evrer èvrerais/j'n'q'l'm't' evrer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 eter èterais/j'n'q'l'm't' eter po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 eler èlerais/j'n'q'l'm't' eler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b0 ecer ècerait/n'q'l'm't's' ecer po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 emer èmerait/n'q'l'm't's' emer po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 ener ènerait/n'q'l'm't's' ener po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 eper èperait/n'q'l'm't's' eper po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 erer èrerait/n'q'l'm't's' erer po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 eser èserait/n'q'l'm't's' eser po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 ever èverait/n'q'l'm't's' ever po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 evrer èvrerait/n'q'l'm't's' evrer po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 eter èterait/n'q'l'm't's' eter po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 eler èlerait/n'q'l'm't's' eler po:cond po:3sg
SFX b0 ecer ècerions/n'q'l't' ecer po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 emer èmerions/n'q'l't' emer po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 ener ènerions/n'q'l't' ener po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 eper èperions/n'q'l't' eper po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 erer èrerions/n'q'l't' erer po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 eser èserions/n'q'l't' eser po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 ever èverions/n'q'l't' ever po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 evrer èvrerions/n'q'l't' evrer po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 eter èterions/n'q'l't' eter po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 eler èlerions/n'q'l't' eler po:cond po:1pl
SFX b0 ecer èceriez/n'q'l'm' ecer po:cond po:2pl
SFX b0 emer èmeriez/n'q'l'm' emer po:cond po:2pl
SFX b0 ener èneriez/n'q'l'm' ener po:cond po:2pl
SFX b0 eper èperiez/n'q'l'm' eper po:cond po:2pl
SFX b0 erer èreriez/n'q'l'm' erer po:cond po:2pl
